th: ประเภทการประกอบโครงขึงผ้าใบ: ชิ้นส่วนมุมเท่านั้น; แบบถอดประกอบ (ต้องประกอบเอง); เฟรมประกอบสำเร็จรูป; ชุดไม้ขึงเฟรม (ไม้เท่านั้น); ชุดขึงเฟรม (ไม้ + ลิ่ม/อุปกรณ์); อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av montering av dukbår: Endast hörndelar; Platt paket (montering krävs); Förmonterad ram; Kilramsset (endast ramlister); Kilramskit (ramlister + kilar/beslag); Övrigt
nl: Canvas spieraam montagetype: Alleen hoekstukken; Flatpack (montage vereist); Voorgemonteerd frame; Spieraamset (alleen latten); Spieraamkit (latten + spietjes/ijzerwaren); Overig
tr: Tuval gergi çerçevesi montaj tipi: Yalnızca köşe parçaları; Yassı paket (montaj gerektirir); Önceden monte edilmiş şasi; Tuval şasi çıtası seti (sadece çıtalar); Şasi kiti (çıtalar + kamalar/donanım); Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do esticador de tela: Apenas peças de canto; Embalagem plana (requer montagem); Estrutura pré-montada; Conjunto de barras de esticador (apenas barras); Kit de esticador (barras + cunhas/ferragens); Outro
cs: Typ montáže napínacího rámu na plátno: Pouze rohové spojky; V rozloženém stavu (vyžaduje montáž); Předem sestavený rám; Sada napínacích lišt (pouze lišty); Napínací sada (lišty + klínky/kování); Ostatní
hu: Vászon hordágy összeszerelési típusa: Csak sarokelemek; Lapraszerelt (összeszerelést igényel); Előszerelt keret; Vakráma készlet (csak lécek); Vakráma készlet (lécek + ékek/szerelvények); Egyéb
es: Tipo de montaje del bastidor de lona: Solo piezas de esquina; Paquete plano (requiere ensamblaje); Marco preensamblado; Juego de bastidores (solo barras); Kit de bastidor (barras + cuñas/tornillería); Otro
nb: Monteringstype for lerretsbåre: Kun hjørnestykker; Flatpakket (montering kreves); Forhåndsmontert ramme; Blindrammesett (kun lister); Blindrammesett (lister + kiler/beslag); Annet
it: Tipo di assemblaggio del telaio per telai: Solo angolari; In kit (da montare); Telaio preassemblato; Set di listelli per telaio (solo listelli); Kit telaio (listelli + chiavi/ferramenta); Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta sklopa nosila za platno: Samo kutni dijelovi; Zapakirano u ravnoj kutiji (potrebno sastavljanje); Unaprijed sastavljeni okvir; Komplet letvica za napinjanje (samo letvice); Komplet za napinjanje (letvice + okovi); Ostalo
ru: Тип сборки подрамника холста: Только уголки; В плоской упаковке (требуется сборка); Собранный подрамник; Набор реек для подрамника (только рейки); Комплект подрамника (рейки + клинья/крепеж); Другое
fr: Type d’assemblage du châssis de toile: Pièces d’angle uniquement; En kit (assemblage requis); Châssis préassemblé; Jeu de tasseaux (tasseaux uniquement); Kit de châssis (tasseaux + clés/quincaillerie); Autre
zh-CN: 油画绷架组装款式: 仅角件; 平板包装（需要组装）; 预组装框架; 绷布框条套装（仅画框条）; 绷布框套件（画框条 + 楔子/五金件）; 其他
el: Τύπος συναρμολόγησης του τελάρου καμβά: Μόνο γωνιακά κομμάτια; Επίπεδη συσκευασία (απαιτείται συναρμολόγηση); Προσυναρμολογημένο πλαίσιο; Σετ πηχάκια τελάρου (μόνο πηχάκια); Κιτ τελάρου (πηχάκια + σφήνες/υλικό); Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de asamblare a dispozitivului pentru întins pânza: Doar piese de colț; Pachet plat (necesită asamblare); Cadru preasamblat; Set de șasiu (doar bare); Kit de șasiu (bare + pene/feronerie); Altele
da: Lærredbårens monteringstype: Kun hjørnestykker; Fladpakket (kræver samling); Forsamlet ramme; Blindrammesæt (kun lister); Blindrammesæt (lister + kiler/beslag); Andet
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на рамката за опъване на платното: Само ъглови части; В разглобен вид (изисква сглобяване); Предварително сглобена рамка; Комплект подрамка (само летви); Комплект за подрамка (летви + клинове/обков); Други
de: Montageart des Leinwandkeilrahmens: Nur Eckteile; Flatpack (Montage erforderlich); Vormontierter Rahmen; Keilrahmenleisten-Set (nur Leisten); Keilrahmen-Set (Leisten + Keile/Eisenwaren); Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ zostavy naťahovača plátna: Len rohové diely; V rozloženom stave (vyžaduje sa montáž); Vopred zmontovaný rám; Súprava napínacích líšt (len lišty); Napínacia súprava (lišty + kľúče/príslušenstvo); Iné
ko: 캔버스 틀 조립형: 코너 피스 단품; 플랫 팩(조립 필요); 사전 조립 프레임; 스트레처 바 세트(바 단품); 스트레처 키트(바 + 키/하드웨어); 기타
vi: Loại khung căng canvas: Chỉ gồm miếng góc; Đóng gói phẳng (yêu cầu lắp ráp); Khung lắp ráp sẵn; Bộ thanh căng (chỉ gồm thanh); Bộ dụng cụ căng vải (thanh + chốt/linh kiện); Khác
pl: Typ montażu blejtramu: Tylko elementy narożne; W paczce (wymaga montażu); Złożona rama; Krosno malarskie (same listwy); Zestaw krosien (listwy + kliny/okucia); Inne
lt-LT: Drobės rėmo surinkimo tipas: Tik kampinės dalys; Išardyta (reikia surinkti); Iš anksto surinktas rėmas; Porėmių rinkinys (tik sijos); Porėmio rinkinys (sijos + tvirtinimo detalės); Kita
ja: キャンバス張り枠アセンブリタイプ: コーナーピースのみ; フラットパック (要組み立て); 組み立て済みフレーム; ストレッチャーバーセット (バーのみ); ストレッチャーキット (バー + キー/金具); その他
sl-SI: Vrsta sklopa držala platna: Samo kotni deli; Ploščato pakirano (potrebno sestavljanje); Predsestavljen okvir; Komplet napenjalnih letev (samo letve); Komplet za napenjanje (letve + klini/okovje); Drugo
zh-TW: 畫布延展框組件類型: 僅角件; 平板包裝 (需組裝); 預組裝框架; 畫布內框條組 (僅框條); 畫布內框工具包 (框條 + 榫片/五金); 其他
en: Canvas stretcher assembly type: Corner pieces only; Flat-pack (assembly required); Pre-assembled frame; Stretcher bar set (bars only); Stretcher kit (bars + keys/hardware); Other
fi: Kangaspaarien kokoonpanotyyppi: Vain kulmakappaleet; Litteä pakkaus (vaatii kokoamista); Valmiiksi koottu runko; Kiilakehyssarja (vain listat); Kiilakehyspakkaus (listat + kiilat/kiinnikkeet); Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do bastidor de tela: Apenas peças de canto; Flat-pack (requer montagem); Estrutura pré-montada; Conjunto de barras extensoras (apenas barras); Kit extensor (barras + chaves/ferragens); Outro